Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2920
Director; report.

The director shall provide an annual report regarding the implementation of the Dispute Resolution Act. The report shall be available to the public on the Supreme Court's website. The report shall include the number and types of disputes received, the disposition of the disputes, any problems encountered, and any recommendations to address problems.

Laws 1991, LB 90, § 20;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 29;

Laws 2019, LB595, § 21.